New York, session 2025-2026, S10053.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 4 of section 468-a of the judiciary law, as 2 amended by section 9 of part K of chapter 56 of the laws of 2010, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 4. The biennial registration fee shall be three hundred seventy-five 5 dollars, sixty dollars of which shall be allocated to and be deposited 6 in a fund established pursuant to the provisions of section ninety-sev- 7 en-t of the state finance law, fifty dollars of which shall be allocated 8 to and shall be deposited in a fund established pursuant to the 9 provisions of section ninety-eight-b of the state finance law, twenty- 10 five dollars of which shall be allocated to be deposited in a fund 11 established pursuant to the provisions of section ninety-eight-c of the 12 state finance law, and the remainder of which shall be deposited in the 13 attorney licensing fund. Such fee shall be required of every attorney 14 who is admitted and licensed to practice law in this state, whether or 15 not the attorney is engaged in the practice of law in this state or 16 elsewhere, except attorneys who certify to the chief administrator of 17 the courts that they have either retired from the practice of law or are 18 employed in a public service job as defined by 20 U.S.C. 1087e(m)(3)(B). 19 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 20 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 21 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 22 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made on or before 23 such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07902-01-5